District of Columbia statutes.
28-2909

Tax obligations.

This chapter does not affect any obligation of a corporation or transfer agent with respect to estate, inheritance, succession, or other taxes imposed by the laws of the District of Columbia.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 674, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
1981 Ed., § 28-2909.
1973 Ed., § 28-2909.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 9 of the Uniform Act for Simplification of Fiduciary Security Transfers.